Rhode Island, session 2025, HB5454.
It is enacted by the General Assembly as follows:
SECTION 1. Section 22-6-15 of the General Laws in Chapter 22-6 entitled "Committees
and Staff" is hereby amended to read as follows:
22-6-15. Annual appropriations.
The general assembly shall annually appropriate a sum that shall be necessary to carry out
the provisions of §§ 22-6-10 — 22-6-14 and § 22-6-16.
SECTION 2. Chapter 22-6 of the General Laws entitled "Committees and Staff" is hereby
amended by adding thereto the following section:
22-6-16. Nonprofit funding transparency.
Any nonprofit entity, as a condition to requesting state grants or funding from the general
assembly, shall submit to the general assembly and post on their website, a complete and detailed
list consisting of the ten (10) highest paid director, officer and employee salaries, costs, benefits
including, but not limited to, health insurance and rental cars, and any and all forms of
compensation provided to those individuals in the organization. Any other sources of funding,
including fundraising, endowments, trusts, memorial giving and/or any and all activities that fund
the nonprofit entity shall also be included in the disclosure.
SECTION 3. This act shall take effect upon passage.
========
LC001100
========